District of Columbia statutes.
19-318

Antenuptial children.

When a man has a child by a woman whom he afterwards marries, the child, if acknowledged by the man, is, in virtue of the marriage and acknowledgment, legitimated and capable in law of inheriting and transmitting heritable property as if born in wedlock.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-318.
1973 Ed., § 19-318.